foma/verb/ThamizhiFST-C4.foma
### Tamil.foma ###

read lexc ThamizhiVerbs-C4.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

define C4R1 {ை} -> {ைய} || _ "^" [{ும்}|{அ}|{ா}];
define C4R2  {்} -> 0  || _ "^" [{ும்}|{ா}];
define C4R3 {ி} -> {ிய} || _ "^" [{ும்}|{ா}];
define C4R4 {ு} -> {ுக்க} || _ "^" [{ும்}|{அ}];
define C4R5 {ழ்} -> {ழ}  || _ "^" [{அ}];
define C4R6 {ி} -> {ிக்க}  || _ "^" [{அ}];
define C4R7 {ர்} -> {ர்க்க} || _ "^" [{அ}];
define C4R8 [{தீ}] -> {தீய} || _ "^" [{அ}|{ா}];
define C4R9 [{ஈ}] -> {ஈய} || _ "^" [{அ}];


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup1 "அ" -> 0 || "^" _;
define Cleanup2 "^" -> 0;

define ClassFourGrammar 	Lexicon	.o.
		C4R1	.o.
		C4R2	.o.
		C4R3	.o.
		C4R4	.o.
		C4R5	.o.
		C4R6	.o.
		C4R7	.o.
		C4R8	.o.
		C4R9	.o.
		Cleanup1		.o.
		Cleanup2;

regex ClassFourGrammar;
